Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 35
COMMISSIONS TO ADMINISTER COMPACTS

Sec.

§ 42-3501. Bear River Compact commissioners — Appointment.

The governor of the state of Idaho is hereby authorized and directed to appoint three (3) commissioners to represent the state of Idaho on a joint commission to be composed of three (3) commissioners from each of the states of Idaho, Utah, and Wyoming and one (1) commissioner that may be appointed to represent the United States of America, the said joint commission to be constituted for the purpose of administration of the Bear River Compact.

§ 42-3502. Qualifications of commissioners of Bear River Compact.

Two (2) of the commissioners shall be electors of the state of Idaho who are residents within the watershed of the Bear River in Idaho. One (1) commissioner may be the director of the department of water resources of the state of Idaho.

§ 42-3503. Terms of Bear River Compact commissioners — Filling vacancies.

The appointment of each commissioner shall be for a six (6) year term but may be terminated at the pleasure of the governor: Provided that the appointments of the commissioners first appointed shall terminate at two (2) year intervals beginning with the end of the first even numbered year after the Bear River Compact goes into effect. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term in which the vacancy occurs.

§ 42-3504. Remuneration and expenses of Bear River Compact commissioners.

The remuneration and expenses of the commissioners shall be fixed by the governor. The remuneration and expenses of the commissioners and the share of the state of Idaho in the expenses of the Bear River Commission shall be appropriated by the legislature to the department of water resources for these purposes.

§ 42-3505. Columbia Interstate Compact becoming operative upon ratification and enactment of legislation.

The compact set forth in section 42-3403[, Idaho Code,] shall not become operative unless and until it has been ratified and approved by appropriate legislative enactment by the states of Washington, Oregon and Montana, and has been consented to and approved by the congress of the United States by legislation conforming to the requirement of subdivision A of article XIV of said compact. The governor of Idaho shall give notice of the ratification and approval of this compact by the Idaho legislature to the governors of the states of Washington, Oregon, Montana, Wyoming, Nevada and Utah and to the President of the United States.

§ 42-3506. Commissioners of Columbia Compact Commission — Appointment — Term — Vacancies.

There shall be three (3) members of the Columbia Compact Commission from the state of Idaho. They shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate and shall hold office at the pleasure of the governor. The terms of each of the initial three (3) members shall begin at the time of appointment, provided said compact shall then have gone into effect; otherwise, shall begin upon the date which said compact shall become effective. The term of one (1) of said three (3) commissioners first appointed shall be two (2) years, one (1) shall be four (4) years, and one (1) shall be six (6) years; and their successors shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate for terms of six (6) years each. Each commissioner shall hold office until his successor shall be appointed or qualified. Vacancies occurring in the office of any such commissioner for any reason or cause shall be filled by appointment by the governor with the consent of the senate for the unexpired term. Any appointment made by the governor while the senate is not in session shall be effective as a temporary appointment until the next meeting of the senate when the governor shall present to that body his nomination for the office.

§ 42-3507. Powers granted to Columbia Compact Commission.

There is hereby granted to the commission and the commissioners thereof all the powers provided for in said compact and all powers necessary or incidental to the carrying out of said compact in every particular.

§ 42-3508. Per diem and expenses paid Columbia Compact Commission.

Each member of the Commission from the state of Idaho shall be compensated, from funds appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose, as provided by section 59-509(f), Idaho Code, for each day devoted to the business of the Commission. Such member may, regardless of any charter or statutory provision to the contrary, be an officer or employee holding another public position.

§ 42-3509. Remuneration and expenses of Columbia Compact commissioners.

The remuneration and expenses of the commissioners and the share of the state of Idaho in the expenses of the Columbia Compact Commission shall be appropriated by the legislature to the state department of water resources for these purposes.

§ 42-3510. State officers to render assistance to Columbia Compact Commission.

All officers of this state are hereby authorized and directed to do all things, falling within their respective provinces and jurisdiction, necessary to or incidental to the carrying out of said compact in every particular. All officers, bureaus, departments and persons of and in the government or administration of this state are hereby authorized and directed, at convenient times and upon the request of the said commission, to furnish said commission with information and data possessed by them or any of them, and to aid said commission by any means lying within their legal powers respectively.

§ 42-3511. Powers granted Columbia Compact Commission supplemental to those contained in compact.

Any powers herein granted to the commission shall be regarded as in aid of and supplemental to and in no case a limitation upon any of the powers vested in said commission by other laws of this state or by the laws of other signatory states or by congress or by the terms of said compact, which shall be liberally construed.